New.aff
PFX R 0 buliba .
PFX R 0 buligu .
PFX R 0 buligi .
PFX R 0 bulizi .
PFX R 0 buliki .
PFX R 0 bulibi .
PFX R 0 bulili .
PFX R 0 buliga .
PFX R 0 bulika .
PFX R 0 bulibu .
PFX R 0 bulilu .
PFX R 0 buliku .
PFX R 0 bulitu .
PFX R 0 obulin [^lmn]
PFX R l obulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l obulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w obulimp [w]
PFX R 0 obulimu .
PFX R 0 obuliba .
PFX R 0 obuligu .
PFX R 0 obuligi .
PFX R 0 obulizi .
PFX R 0 obuliki .
PFX R 0 obulibi .
PFX R 0 obulili .
PFX R 0 obuliga .
PFX R 0 obulika .
PFX R 0 obulibu .
PFX R 0 obulilu .
PFX R 0 obuliku .
PFX R 0 obulitu .
PFX R 0 lulin [^lmn]
PFX R l lulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l lulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w lulimp [w]
PFX R 0 lulimu .
PFX R 0 luliba .
PFX R 0 luligu .
PFX R 0 luligi .
PFX R 0 lulizi .
PFX R 0 luliki .
PFX R 0 lulibi .
PFX R 0 lulili .
PFX R 0 luliga .
PFX R 0 lulika .
PFX R 0 lulibu .
PFX R 0 lulilu .
PFX R 0 luliku .
PFX R 0 lulitu .
PFX R 0 olulin [^lmn]
PFX R l olulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l olulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w olulimp [w]
PFX R 0 olulimu .
PFX R 0 oluliba .
PFX R 0 oluligu .
PFX R 0 oluligi .
PFX R 0 olulizi .
PFX R 0 oluliki .
PFX R 0 olulibi .
PFX R 0 olulili .
PFX R 0 oluliga .
PFX R 0 olulika .
PFX R 0 olulibu .
PFX R 0 olulilu .
PFX R 0 oluliku .
PFX R 0 olulitu .
PFX R 0 kulin [^lmn]
PFX R l kulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l kulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w kulimp [w]
PFX R 0 kulimu .
PFX R 0 kuliba .
PFX R 0 kuligu .
PFX R 0 kuligi .
PFX R 0 kulizi .
PFX R 0 kuliki .
PFX R 0 kulibi .
PFX R 0 kulili .
PFX R 0 kuliga .
PFX R 0 kulika .
PFX R 0 kulibu .
PFX R 0 kulilu .
PFX R 0 kuliku .
PFX R 0 kulitu .
PFX R 0 okulin [^lmn]
PFX R l okulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l okulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w okulimp [w]
PFX R 0 okulimu .
PFX R 0 okuliba .
PFX R 0 okuligu .
PFX R 0 okuligi .
PFX R 0 okulizi .
PFX R 0 okuliki .
PFX R 0 okulibi .
PFX R 0 okulili .
PFX R 0 okuliga .
PFX R 0 okulika .
PFX R 0 okulibu .
PFX R 0 okulilu .
PFX R 0 okuliku .
PFX R 0 okulitu .
PFX R 0 otulin [^lmn]
PFX R l otulind l.[^mn]
PFX R l otulinn l.[mn]
PFX R w otulimp [w]
PFX R 0 otulimu .
PFX R 0 otuliba .
PFX R 0 otuligu .
PFX R 0 otuligi .
PFX R 0 otulizi .
PFX R 0 otuliki .
PFX R 0 otulibi .
PFX R 0 otulili .
PFX R 0 otuliga .
PFX R 0 otulika .
PFX R 0 otulibu .
PFX R 0 otulilu .
PFX R 0 otuliku .
PFX R 0 otulitu .
PFX R 0 zitalo .
